Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2158YC (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 280.13C, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 e. âLicensed health care providerâ means a physician, 3 physician assistant, chiropractor, advanced registered nurse 4 practitioner, nurse, person who holds a doctorate in psychology 5 with specialty training in neuropsychology or concussion 6 management, physical therapist, occupational therapist, or 7 athletic trainer licensed by a board designated under section 8 147.13 . 9